California, session 20252026, SB855.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other law, and pursuant to Section 435 of the Military and Veterans Code, the Director of General Services, with the approval of the Adjutant General, may transfer, exchange, or sell any of the following properties:(a) Approximately four acres of real property with improvements made thereon, located at 6501 Olmeda Avenue, Atascadero, California, known as the Atascadero Armory.(b) Approximately 4.38 acres of real property with improvements made thereon, located at 3517 W Street, Eureka, California, known as the Eureka Armory.(c) Approximately two acres of real property with improvements made thereon, located at 8490 Wren Avenue, Gilroy, California, known as the Gilroy Armory.(d) Approximately 1.75 acres of real property with improvements made thereon, located at 333 N Washington Street, Lodi, California, known as the Lodi Armory.(e) Approximately one acre of real property, with improvements made thereon, located at 224 S Taylor Avenue, Montebello, California, known as the Montebello Armory.(f) Approximately 4.7 acres of real property with improvements made thereon, located at 29 N Plano Street, Porterville, California, known as the Porterville Armory.(g) Approximately 1.97 acres of real property, with improvements made thereon, located at 455 3rd Avenue, San Bruno, California, known as the San Bruno Armory.